Utah statutes.
17B-2a-822.   Multicounty district may employ or contract for law enforcement officers -- Law enforcement officer status, powers, and jurisdiction.

(1)  The board of trustees of a multicounty district may employ law enforcement officers or contract with other law enforcement agencies to provide law enforcement services for the district.

(2)  A law enforcement officer employed or provided by contract under Subsection (1) is a law enforcement officer under Section 53-13-103 and shall be subject to the provisions of that section.

(3)  Subject to the provisions of Section 53-13-103, the jurisdiction of a law enforcement officer employed under this section is limited to transit facilities and transit vehicles.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

